Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1271.6] Protective order. If
proof of the existence of the nuisance depends, in whole or in part, upon the
affidavits or testimony of witnesses who are not law enforcement officers, the
court, upon a showing of prior threats of violence or acts of violence by any
defendant may issue orders to protect those witnesses including, but not
limited to, the nondisclosure of the name, address, or any other information
that may identify those witnesses. [L 2005, c 123, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next